Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 27.1 Aggressive Driving

31-27.1-1.
Legislative findings.

The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) estimates that aggressive driving causes two-thirds (2/3) of fatal accidents and one-third (1/3) of all accidents. The general assembly finds that aggressive driving has become a significant public safety concern in recent years and specific legislation designed to severely curtail this problem driving behavior is in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 254, § 1.

31-27.1-2.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Aggressive Driving Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 254, § 1.

31-27.1-3.
“Aggressive driving” defined.

“Aggressive driving” means that an individual, coincident to operating a motor vehicle in violation of chapter 14 of this title, engages in conduct which violates two (2) or more of the following sections of law:

Obedience to traffic control devices, §

31-13-4

;

Overtaking on the right, §

31-15-5

;

Driving within a traffic lane, §

31-15-1

;

Following too closely — interval between vehicles, §

31-15-12

;

Yielding right of way, §§

31-15-12.1

,

31-17-1

,

31-17-2

,

31-17-4

,

31-17-6

,

31-17-7

and

31-17-8

;

Entering the roadway, §§

31-15-14

,

31-17-3

and

31-17-5

;

Use of turn signals, §§

31-16-5

,

31-16-6

,

31-16-8

and

31-16-9

;

Relating to school buses, special stops, stop signs and yield signs, chapter 20 of this title; and

Use of emergency break-down lane for travel, §

31-15-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 254, § 1.

31-27.1-4.
Penalties.

Whoever violates this chapter shall be fined not less than two hundred sixty dollars ($260) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, any person convicted of a first offense of aggressive driving may be required to attend an educational program approved by the division of motor vehicles designed to improve the safety and habits of drivers and may be subject to a minimum thirty (30) days suspension of his or her driver’s license.

The lesser included offenses which, in total, may constitute aggressive driving, may be prosecuted separately.

All violations of this chapter shall be heard and determined by the traffic tribunal pursuant to the regulations promulgated by the chief magistrate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 11.